Hawaii statutes.
§501-87 No adverse possession or
prescription. No title, right, or interest in, to, or across registered
land in derogation of that of the registered owner shall be acquired by
prescription or adverse possession; provided that this section shall not prejudice
any adverse claim, as against any person registered as first owner of land with
a possessory title only, in respect of length of possession of any other
person, who was in possession of the land at the time when the registration of
the first owner took place.

Land registered pursuant to this chapter is not
subject to surrender under section 264-1. [L 1903, c 56, §46; am L 1921, c 135,
§1; RL 1925, §3236; RL 1935, §5046; RL 1945, §12646; am L 1949, c 64, §1; RL
1955, §342-47; HRS §501-87]

Case Notes

Considered in relation to unregistered sublease where
sublessee in possession. 33 H. 343, 346.

Cited: 40 H. 730, 733; 73 H. 297, 832 P.2d 724.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next